Hawaii statutes.
§142-47 Obliterating brand; penalty.
Any person who obliterates any brand or mark, on any animal, by placing another
brand or mark over the same, or otherwise, although without felonious intent,
shall be fined not more than $200 for every brand or mark so obliterated. [PC
1869, c 83, §2 (same as CC 1859, §249); RL 1925, §687; RL 1935, §265; RL 1945,
§1074; RL 1955, §20-46; HRS §142-47; am L 1984, c 8, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next